Utah statutes.
16-16-1305.   Proceeds and expenses.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2):
(a)  any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action to enforce a right
of a limited cooperative association, whether by judgment, compromise, or
settlement, belong to the association and not to the plaintiff; and
(b)  if the plaintiff in the derivative action receives any proceeds, the
plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the association.
(2)  If a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited cooperative
association is successful in whole or in part, the court may award the
plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees and costs,
from the recovery of the association.
